California, session 20252026, AB2058.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19982 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:19982. (a) The department by rule and regulation shall establish a schedule of fees to pay and recover the costs incurred by the department for the work related to the administration and enforcement of this part. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fees collected shall be placed in the Mobilehome-Manufactured Home Revolving Fund established by Section 18016.5, and are continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure in carrying out this part.(b) The total amount of money collected pursuant to this part and contained in the Mobilehome-Manufactured Home Revolving Fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not exceed the amount needed for operating expenses for one year for the enforcement of this part. If the total amount of money collected pursuant to this part in the fund exceeds this amount, the department shall make appropriate reductions in the schedule of fees authorized by this section.SEC. 2. Section 19991 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:19991. (a) The department shall enforce every provision of this part, the building standards published in the State Building Standards Code relating to factory-built housing, and the other regulations adopted pursuant to this part, except as provided in Sections 19991.1, 19991.3, 19991.4, 19992, 19992.1, and 19992.2.(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter the authority of a local enforcement agency to issue or withhold a certificate of occupancy in accordance with any other law.SEC. 3. Section 19992 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:19992. The installation of factory-built housing shall be conducted in accordance with the requirements of the building standards published in the State Building Standards Code relating to factory-built housing and the other requirements of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 17910), subject to the provisions of Section 19990. A local enforcement agency or quality assurance agency shall not disassemble, damage, or destroy factory-built housing while inspecting the installation of that factory-built housing, pursuant to Section 19992.1.SEC. 4. Section 19992.1 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:19992.1. (a) (1) A first user shall choose to have either the local enforcement agency or a quality assurance agency, acting on behalf and subject to the supervision of the department, enforce and inspect the installation of factory-built housing.(2) If a first user chooses to have a quality assurance agency enforce and inspect the installation of factory-built housing, the first user shall cover the cost of the inspection.(b) (1) The local enforcement agency may, by ordinance, establish impose an inspection fee for the inspection of the installation of factory-built housing, provided that the fee is no more than 50 percent of the equivalent inspection fee for nonfactory-built housing.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a local enforcement agency may impose an inspection fee for the inspection of the installation of factory-built housing that exceeds 50 percent of the equivalent inspection fee for nonfactory-built housing if the local enforcement agency, as part of a written finding and an adopted resolution or ordinance, provides substantial evidence of the reasonable cost to conduct the inspections.(c) If a first user chooses to have a quality assurance agency enforce and inspect the installation of factory-built housing, the local enforcement agency shall not charge an inspection fee.SEC. 5. Section 19992.2 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:19992.2. (a) A local enforcement agency shall not establish impose any permitting fee related to factory-built housing that exceeds 50 percent of the equivalent permitting fee for nonfactory-built housing.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a local enforcement agency may impose a permitting fee related to factory-built housing that exceeds 50 percent of the equivalent permitting fee for nonfactory-built housing if the local enforcement agency, as part of a written finding and an adopted resolution or ordinance, provides substantial evidence of the reasonable cost to review the permits.SEC. 6. The Legislature finds and declares that the provision of adequate housing, in light of the severe shortage of housing at all income levels in the state, is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of this act amending Sections 19991 and 19992 of, and adding Sections 19992.1 and 19992.2 to, the Health and Safety Code, respectively, apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.